apertium-eo-en.en.dix
<pardef n="b/y__adv">
<e>                           <p><l>ily</l>                 <r>y<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>y</l>                   <r>y<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="forward__adv">
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>s</l>                   <r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="e/at__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>ating</l>               <r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>at</l>                  <r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>aten</l>                <r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>at</l>                  <r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ats</l>                 <r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="stri/fe__n">
<e>                           <p><l>fes</l>                 <r>fe<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ves</l>                 <r>fe<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>fe</l>                  <r>fe<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="m/ouse__n">
<e>                           <p><l>ice</l>                 <r>ouse<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ouses</l>               <r>ouse<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ouse</l>                <r>ouse<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="st/eal__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>ealing</l>              <r>eal<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ole</l>                 <r>eal<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>olen</l>                <r>eal<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>eal</l>                 <r>eal<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>eals</l>                <r>eal<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="man/oeuvre__n">
<e>                           <p><l>euvers</l>              <r>oeuvre<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>euver</l>               <r>oeuvre<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="dow/stream__adv">
<e>                           <p><l>nstream</l>             <r>stream<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="whir__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>ing</l>                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ring</l>                <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ed</l>                  <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>red</l>                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ed</l>                  <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>red</l>                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>s</l>                   <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="misunderst/and__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>anding</l>              <r>and<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>anded</l>               <r>and<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ood</l>                 <r>and<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>anded</l>               <r>and<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ood</l>                 <r>and<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>and</l>                 <r>and<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ands</l>                <r>and<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

        </pardefs>

<e lm="by">                   <i>b</i><par n="b/y__adv"/></e>
<e lm="strife">               <i>stri</i><par n="stri/fe__n"/></e>
<e lm="whir">                 <i>whir</i><par n="whir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="mouse">                <i>m</i><par n="m/ouse__n"/></e>
